Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-310
Herd laws; violations; rewards; authorized.

The county boards of the several counties may offer and pay rewards for the detection of those violating sections 54-301 to 54-309.

Laws 1879, § 9, p. 70;

R.S.1913, § 104;

C.S.1922, § 112;

C.S.1929, § 54-309;

R.S.1943, § 54-310.